Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXI Agriculture and Animals
Fairs

247.090.
State fair board — Membership — Vacancies — State Fair Board not subject to reorganization under KRS Chapter 12.

The State Fair Board shall be composed of sixteen (16) voting members and five (5) ex officio, nonvoting members, as follows:

The Governor or his or her designee;

The Commissioner of Agriculture or his or her designee;

The President of the Senate or his or her designee, who shall serve as an ex officio, nonvoting member for the duration of his or her service as President of the Senate;

The Speaker of the House of Representatives or his or her designee, who shall serve as an ex officio, nonvoting member for the duration of his or her service as Speaker of the House of Representatives;

The secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet or his or her designee, who shall serve as an ex officio, nonvoting member for the duration of his or her service as secretary of the cabinet. The secretary shall provide additional financial expertise to the Kentucky State Fair Board, with no resulting personnel impact, fiscal impact, nor expense to Kentucky state government;

The dean of the University of Kentucky College of Agriculture, Food and Environment or his or her designee;

Four (4) members appointed by the Governor from the state at large with due consideration to geographical distribution throughout the state;

Three (3) members appointed by the Commissioner of Agriculture from the state at large who are involved with, or experienced in, agriculture or agriculture-related businesses;

One (1) member appointed by the Commissioner of Agriculture from a list of six (6) nominees that are representative of all segments of animal agriculture provided by trade organizations and commodity groups that may include but not be limited to the Kentucky Cattlemen’s Association, Kentucky Dairy Development Council, Kentucky Livestock Improvement Association, Kentucky Pork Producers Association, Kentucky Poultry Federation, and Kentucky Sheep and Goat Development Office;

One (1) member appointed by the Commissioner of Agriculture from a list of six (6) nominees that are representative of all segments of crop or plant production provided by trade organizations or commodity groups that may include but not be limited to Kentucky Corn Growers Association, Kentucky Grape and Wine Council, Kentucky Horticulture Council, Kentucky Small Grain Growers Association, and Kentucky Soybean Association;

One (1) member appointed by the Commissioner of Agriculture from a list of six (6) nominees submitted by the governing body of the American Saddlebred Horse Association;

One (1) member appointed by the Commissioner of Agriculture from a list of six (6) nominees provided by the Kentucky Farm Bureau Federation;

One (1) member appointed by the Commissioner of Agriculture from a list of six (6) nominees provided by the Kentucky Association of Fairs and Horse Shows;

One (1) member appointed by the Governor from a list of six (6) nominees provided by the Louisville Convention and Visitors Bureau representing the hospitality and tourism industry;

The state president of the Kentucky FFA Association, who shall serve as an ex officio, nonvoting member for the duration of his or her term as student leader of the association; and

The state president of the Kentucky 4-H Organization, who shall serve as an ex officio, nonvoting member for the duration of his or her term as student leader of the organization.

The terms of the members of the board appointed by the Commissioner of Agriculture or the Governor, respectively, shall be staggered terms and shall be subject to confirmation as provided in KRS 11.160(2). Members of the board shall be appointed to a term of four (4) years and shall serve until their successors are duly appointed and qualified. Members of the board shall be appointed to no more than three (3) terms that began on or after March 29, 2021. Terms that began prior to March 29, 2021, shall not count toward the term limits established by this subsection. As the terms of each group of members expire, the Commissioner of Agriculture or the Governor, as the case may be, shall appoint successors for terms of four (4) years and until their successors are appointed and qualify. The initial appointments of the members designated in subsection (1)(g) and (h) of this section shall be for staggered terms, as follows:

Pursuant to subsection (1)(g) of this section, the Governor shall appoint one (1) at-large member in 2022, one (1) at-large member in 2023, and two (2) at-large members in 2024 to replace or reappoint current members whose terms expire in each of these years;

Pursuant to subsection 1(h) of this section, the Commissioner of Agriculture shall appoint one (1) at-large member in 2021, one (1) at-large member in 2022, and one (1) at-large member in 2023 to replace or reappoint current members whose terms expire in each of these years;

On March 29, 2021 and pursuant to subsection (1)(h) of this section, the Commissioner of Agriculture shall appoint one (1) at-large member to serve a one (1) year term in order to establish the number of voting members as required by this section; and

Those members whose terms expire in 2021 shall be appointed by the Commissioner of Agriculture.

It is the intention of the General Assembly that the political affiliation of the appointed members shall be as evenly divided as possible between the two (2) political parties polling the largest number of votes in the state at general elections.

In case of a vacancy among the appointed members of the board, the unexpired term shall be filled pursuant to the requirements and procedures for original appointments.

The State Fair Board shall not be subject to reorganization under KRS Chapter 12.

History.

4618i-2: amend. Acts 1946, ch. 80, § 1; 1948, ch. 22, § 4; 1948, ch. 62; 1958, ch. 141; 1972, ch. 321, § 1; 1976, ch. 192, § 1; 1982, ch. 454, § 1, effective July 15, 1982; 1994, ch. 486, § 33, effective July 15, 1994; 2016 ch. 142, § 1, effective April 27, 2016; 2017 ch. 9, § 1, effective June 29, 2017; 2021 ch. 163, § 2, effective March 29, 2021.

247.100.
Definition — Corporate powers of State Fair Board — Minutes and records of meetings — Legislative intent — Transfer of records, files, and documents to board.

As used in this section, “solely for administrative purposes” means those limited functions and purposes expressly requested by the State Fair Board to be performed by the Tourism, Arts and Heritage Cabinet. The State Fair Board shall have sole discretion as to which functions shall be deemed necessary for the efficient operation of the State Fair Board and the properties in its custody and control.

The State Fair Board shall be a body corporate with full corporate powers. The General Assembly hereby recognizes and reaffirms that the operations of the State Fair Board and the operation of its facilities are unique activities for state government and that an independent corporate structure is best to enable the State Fair Board to be managed in an entrepreneurial and business-like manner. The State Fair Board shall be an independent, de jure municipal corporation and political subdivision of the Commonwealth of Kentucky, which shall be a public body corporate and politic. The State Fair Board shall be deemed a public agency within the meaning of KRS

61.805

and

61.870

. The State Fair Board shall be attached to the Tourism, Arts and Heritage Cabinet solely for administrative purposes.

Full minutes and records shall be kept of all meetings of the board and all official actions of the board shall be recorded therein, and such minutes and records shall constitute public records and be available at all reasonable times for public inspection.

It is the intent of the General Assembly that the State Fair Board shall be accountable to the Governor, the Commissioner of Agriculture, the General Assembly, and the people of the Commonwealth through a system of audits, reports, and thorough financial disclosures.

On March 29, 2021, any records, files, or documents associated with functions previously performed by the Tourism, Arts and Heritage Cabinet, but for which it is no longer deemed responsible, shall be transferred to the State Fair Board.

History.

4618i-2, 4618i-6: amend. Acts 1946, ch. 80, § 2; 1950, ch. 217, § 1; 2016 ch. 142, § 2, effective April 27, 2016; 2021 ch. 163, § 3, effective March 29, 2021.

Research References and Practice Aids

ALR

Validity and construction of contract exempting agricultural fair or similar bailee from liability for articles delivered for exhibition. 69 A.L.R.3d 1025.

247.110.
Officers of State Fair Board — Meetings — Bylaws — Establishment and authority of executive committee.

The members of the State Fair Board shall select a chair and vice chair from among the voting membership, effective on March 29, 2021. The chair and vice chair shall serve in that capacity for one (1) year and shall be eligible for reelection. The chair shall preside at all meetings and shall have all of the powers and privileges of the other members. The vice chair shall preside in the absence of the chair at all meetings and shall have all the powers and privileges of the other members.

The board shall meet monthly, a minimum of ten (10) months per year. A majority of the voting members of the board shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business.

The board shall adopt bylaws for the regulation of its affairs and the conduct of its business and to prescribe rules, regulations, and policies in connection with the performance of its function and duties.

The board shall elect and employ a secretary who shall be responsible directly to the board as the keeper of all records pertaining to the operation of the fair or the business of the board. The president and chief executive officer provided for in KRS

247.130

shall be ex officio treasurer to the board.

The board as set out in the bylaws adopted under subsection (3) of this section may establish an executive committee from among its membership with full authority to act between its meetings to the extent delegated by the board.

History.

4618i-4: amend. Acts 1946, ch. 80, § 3; 1950, ch. 12; 1990, ch. 485, § 1, effective July 13, 1990; 2016 ch. 142, § 3, effective April 27, 2016; 2021 ch. 163, § 4, effective March 29, 2021.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Appointment to boards and commissions, KRS

12.070

.

Bonds of state officers, KRS

62.160

to

62.190

.

247.120.
Compensation of members.

Members of the board, including the state president of the Kentucky FFA Association and the state president of the Kentucky 4-H Organization, shall receive one hundred dollars ($100) per day for each meeting attended, and shall be reimbursed for all reasonable and necessary expenses paid or incurred in the discharge of official business.

History.

4618i-3: amend. Acts 1956, ch. 86; 1978, ch. 154, § 28, effective June 17, 1978; 1990, ch. 130, § 1, effective July 13, 1990; 2016 ch. 142, § 4, effective April 27, 2016.

247.130.
President — Administrative divisions — Employees and agents — Contracts with management corporation.

The State Fair Board shall have the sole authority to employ or contract with a president who shall not be one of their number. The president shall be the chief executive officer for the board. The employment or contract of a president shall be on the basis of training, ability, and experience. A president shall hold his position during the pleasure of the board, but may be removed only by an affirmative vote of a majority of the members of the board and upon thirty (30) days written notice. A president shall be responsible for the administration of the policies set by the board and shall devote his entire time and attention to the performance of such duties and work as may be required of him by law or be assigned to him by the board. The board shall determine the term, conditions, and compensation of its president, provided such term does not exceed four (4) years.

The president shall have the authority to organize such administrative divisions as may be necessary and may designate chiefs of such divisions who, under his control and supervision, shall have the duties of direction of such divisions. The president shall organize a Division for Personnel Management and Staff Development which shall manage all personnel matters, including staff development and training and programs for affirmative action. The director of this division shall be appointed by the president, and said appointment shall be subject to confirmation by the board. The president shall employ such other employees and agents as he deems necessary for the carrying out of the policies of the board and to conduct the affairs of the State Fair, and shall fix the duties and compensation of any employees or agents with the approval of the board.

The board shall have the sole authority to employ or contract with such other persons, firms, or corporations as the board may deem necessary or desirable to accomplish its duties and functions; shall fix the compensation and the terms of employment or contract of those employed or contracted with; and may assign to them such duties and responsibilities as the board may determine, including the responsibility of actual operation of any or all of the facilities under the control of the board.

The president and any persons employed under this section shall not be subject to the provisions of KRS Chapter 18A.

History.

4618i-4: amend. Acts 1946, ch. 27, § 48; 1946, ch. 80, § 4; 1950, ch. 17, § 2; 1952, ch. 156, § 1; 1958, ch. 126, § 32; 1984, ch. 271, § 1, effective July 13, 1984; 1990, ch. 485, § 2, effective July 13, 1990; 1990, ch. 509, § 1, effective July 13, 1990; 2021 ch. 163, § 5, effective March 29, 2021.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(7/13/90) This section was amended by two 1990 Acts which conflict and cannot be compiled together. Pursuant to KRS

446.250

, the later enactment prevails.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Members of the International Society for Krishna Consciousness would have the right to attend the state fair and to engage in conversation with consenting patrons and to solicit contributions, but the fair board has the power to restrict the activities to a time, place and manner consistent with the use of the property for a fair.

OAG 77-476

.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Appointment to boards and commissions, KRS

12.070

.

Bonds of state officers, KRS

62.160

to

62.190

.

247.140.
Functions of fair board.

The State Fair Board:

Shall have the custody and control of such property as now is under its custody and control, and of such property as may hereafter be placed under its control or transferred to it by the State Property and Buildings Commission, for any purposes mentioned in this section and the physical properties so under its custody and control or transferred to it are hereinafter referred to in this section, and in KRS

247.150

and

247.160

, as the “state fairgrounds and an area in a city of the first class to be used as an exhibition center”;

May erect and repair buildings on the state fairgrounds and exhibition center, make any and all necessary or proper improvements, and generally carry on a program of development and extension of facilities designed to accomplish the objectives defined in this section;

Shall promote the progress of the state and stimulate public interest in the advantages and development of the state by providing the facilities of the state fairgrounds for agricultural and industrial exhibitions, public gatherings, cultural activities, and other functions calculated to advance the educational, physical, and cultural interests of the public and by providing the facilities of the exhibition center for conventions, trade shows, public gatherings, and other functions calculated to advance and enhance the visitor industry, economy, entertainment, cultural and educational interests of the public;

Shall hold an annual fair on the state fairgrounds, for the exhibition of agricultural, mechanical, horticultural, dairy, forestry, poultry, livestock, mineral, and all other industrial interests of the state, and prepare premium lists and establish rules of exhibition for the fair;

May purchase liability insurance for the members and executive officers exempted from the classified service of the state by KRS

18A.115

; and

Shall operate shows and expositions that include but are not limited to the North American International Livestock Exposition, Kentucky State Fair and World’s Championship Horse Show, and National Farm Machinery Show.

The State Fair Board may take, acquire and hold property, and all interest therein, by deed, gift, devise, bequest, lease, or eminent domain, or by transfer from the State Property and Buildings Commission, and may dispose of any property so acquired in the manner provided by law. In the exercise of its power of eminent domain it shall proceed in the manner provided in the Eminent Domain Act of Kentucky.

History.

4618i-5: amend. Acts 1944, ch. 65; 1946, ch. 80, § 5; 1950, ch. 217, § 3; 1974, ch. 154, § 1; 1976, ch. 140, § 96; 1980, ch. 133, § 1, effective July 15, 1980; 1982, ch. 448, § 70, effective July 15, 1982; 1984, ch. 404, § 35, effective July 13, 1984; 2016 ch. 142, § 5, effective April 27, 2016.

247.145.
Administrative regulations for operation, maintenance, or use of state fair property — Posting — Penalty for violation.

The state fair board in governing the operation, maintenance, or use of property under its custody and control is authorized to promulgate such reasonable and lawful administrative regulations, as provided in KRS Chapter 13A, as are necessary:

To maintain decency and good order;

To protect the peace or safety of the general public;

To protect the public interest, convenience, or necessity; or

To govern the operation, maintenance, or use of property under its custody and control.

All administrative regulations promulgated by the state fair board shall be printed and posted at not less than three (3) public places on the property under its custody and control.

All persons using, occupying or going upon any property under the custody and control of the state fair board shall comply with all administrative regulations promulgated by it.

History.

Enact. Acts 1968, ch. 124, § 1(1) to (3); 1970, ch. 254, § 1; 2021 ch. 163, § 6, effective March 29, 2021.

Research References and Practice Aids

ALR

Liability of owner or operator for injury to patron of fair, carnival, or the like, from operation of sideshows, games, or similar concessions. 24 A.L.R.3d 945.

247.147.
State Fair Board’s procurement procedures — Administrative regulations.

The State Fair Board shall:

Conduct all procurements necessary for the performance of its duties in accordance with KRS Chapter 45A and this chapter, provided that this chapter, controls in the event that, and to the extent that, any provision in this chapter is expressly inconsistent with any provision of KRS Chapter 45A; or

Promulgate administrative regulations pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A establishing its procurement procedures.

If the State Fair Board elects to promulgate administrative regulations establishing its procurement procedures rather than conduct procurements in accordance with KRS Chapter 45A, the State Fair Board may include sections of KRS Chapter 45A as part of its administrative regulations and shall require review of personal service contracts, tax incentive agreements, and memorandum of agreements by the Government Contract Review Committee as established by KRS

45A.705

.

Procurements for personal service contracts shall not be subject to the requirements of KRS 45A.695(2)(b), due to the unique operational activities conducted for state government by the State Fair Board as recognized in this chapter.

The State Fair Board’s procurement procedures or administrative regulations shall be designed to provide for the purchase of supplies, equipment, services, and construction items that provide the greatest long-term benefit to the state, the greatest integrity for the State Fair Board, and the best service and products for the public.

In its bidding and negotiation processes, the State Fair Board may:

Perform its own bidding and procurement;

Utilize the services of the Finance and Administration Cabinet; or

Utilize a combination thereof.

The president and chief executive officer of the State Fair Board may, in lieu of the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet, declare an emergency for purchasing purposes.

HISTORY:

2021 ch. 163, § 1, effective March 29, 2021.

247.150.
Policing of fairgrounds and exhibition center.

The State Fair Board may arrange with the county judge/executive or the officer that has charge of the police force of any county or city in which the state fair is held, for the proper policing of the state fairgrounds, and may arrange with the state for the policing of the state fairgrounds by the Department of Kentucky State Police. The State Fair Board may arrange with the mayor or the officer that has charge of the police force of any county or city in which the exhibition center is located for the proper policing of the exhibition center, and may arrange with the state for the policing of the exhibition center by the Department of Kentucky State Police. If the State Fair Board is unable to arrange with a city, county, or state authority for police protection, it may appoint, or may delegate to any agent or employee the power to appoint, subject to the approval of the State Fair Board, necessary special police to properly police the state fairgrounds and exhibition center. Such police officers are vested with the powers and charged with the duties of peace officers.

History.

4618i-6: amend. Acts 1974, ch. 154, § 2; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 20, § 6, effective January 2, 1978; 2007, ch. 85, § 275, effective June 26, 2007.

247.153.
Motor vehicle speed limits on fairgrounds property.

The State Fair Board is authorized to establish by resolution speed limits governing the operation of motor vehicles on state fairgrounds property.

Notice to the public of any speed limits thus established shall be given by signs or markings.

History.

Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 163, § 1 (1) and (2).

247.154.
Traffic control regulations on state fairgrounds.

The State Fair Board is authorized to establish speed limits and other traffic control regulations governing the operation and parking of vehicles on state fairgrounds property, including, without limitation, regulations with respect to the removal, impounding, and release of vehicles parked or standing in violation of any regulation established pursuant to this subsection (1).

Notice to the public of any speed limits or other traffic control regulations thus established shall be given by signs or markings.

History.

Enact. Acts 1968, ch. 123, § 1(1), (2).

247.155.
Gambling devices or games of chance not to be operated — Exception.

It shall be unlawful for any person to open, cause to be opened, carry on, conduct or operate as owner, proprietor or employee any gambling device or game of chance within the confines of the grounds of the Kentucky State Fair. Any person who violates any provision of this section shall be fined not less than fifty dollars ($50) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500) for each offense. Each day in which a gambling device or game of chance is so operated shall be considered a separate offense. This section shall not apply to the sale of lottery tickets sold under the provisions of KRS Chapter 154A.

History.

Enact. Acts 1944, ch. 118, § 1; 1988 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 27, effective December 15, 1988.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

Although references to the sale of “shares” were deleted in the Senate committee substitute, due to a clerical error, such reference was not deleted in the 1988 (Ex. Sess.) amendment of this section. The Reviser of Statutes, pursuant to KRS

7.136

, has removed the words “or shares” to conform.

247.160.
State Fair Board to have exclusive control of all operations and events occurring upon fairgrounds, exhibit center, and any other property under the board’s custody and control — Exception — Lien on property — Sale to satisfy lien.

The State Fair Board shall have exclusive control of all operations and events occurring upon the state fairgrounds and exhibition center and any other properties under the custody and control of the State Fair Board, including but not limited to concessions, exhibitions, shows, facility rental, property development, entertainments, and attractions at any place on the state fairgrounds and exhibition center and may, in the discretion of the board, operate any or all of such concessions, exhibitions, shows, entertainments and attractions, but the board shall not allow the operation of any gambling device or game of chance therein. It may delegate such control or operation to any of its employees or agents, or to an executive committee. This section shall not apply to the sale of lottery tickets sold under the provisions of KRS Chapter 154A.

The State Fair Board shall have a prior lien upon the property of any concessionaire, exhibitor, lessee, or person, immediately upon its coming or being brought on the grounds, or the center, to secure existing or future indebtedness.

Any designated employee or agent of the State Fair Board may sell the property to satisfy the indebtedness after giving ten (10) days’ notice to the owner or agent of the owner or, if notice cannot be given to the owner, after a notice is posted for ten (10) days in the office of the State Fair Board on the grounds, announcing that the property is to be sold. The State Fair Board, through its designated agent, may bid and buy in the property offered for sale for the use and benefit of the State Fair.

History.

4618i-9: amend. Acts 1944, ch. 118, § 2; 1952, ch. 156, § 4; 1974, ch. 154, § 3; 1988 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 28, effective December 15, 1988; 2021 ch. 163, § 7, effective March 29, 2021.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

Although references to the sale of “shares” were deleted in the Senate committee substitute, due to a clerical error, such reference was not deleted in subsection (1) of this section. The Reviser of Statutes, pursuant to KRS

7.136

, has removed the words “or shares” to conform.

247.165.
Exemption of operations on state fairgrounds, exhibition center, and any other properties under the custody and control of the State Fair Board.

None of the provisions of KRS Chapter 137 and none of the provisions of KRS

91.200

shall apply to any operations on state fairgrounds, the exhibition center, or any other properties under the custody and control of the State Fair Board wherein the State Fair Board shares in the receipts and proceeds of such operations.

History.

Enact. Acts 1952, ch. 156, § 3; 1974, ch. 154, § 4; 2021 ch. 163, § 8, effective March 29, 2021.

Research References and Practice Aids

ALR

Exemption from taxation of property of agricultural fair society or association. 89 A.L.R.2d 1104.

247.170.
Appropriations for premiums.

The sum appropriated by the General Assembly for premiums alone shall be paid to the State Fair Board and be disbursed by its agent as a petty cash fund in accordance with the provisions of KRS

45A.650

.

History.

4618i-11: amend. Acts 1952, ch. 179; 1954, ch. 30; 1966, ch. 255, § 219; 1990, ch. 496, § 58, effective July 13, 1990.

247.180.
Revenue bonds.

The State Fair Board is authorized and empowered to issue and sell negotiable revenue bonds in denominations and in an amount or amounts as may be deemed by the board to be for the best interest of the Commonwealth, for any of the following purposes:

To acquire real estate to be devoted to a revenue-producing use.

To pay all or any part of the expense or cost of or incidental to a building project.

To defray the cost of plans, specifications, blue prints, architectural fees and other expenses authorized to be incurred under the terms of KRS

247.130

and

247.140

.

Any revenue bonds so issued shall bear interest at a rate or rates or method of determining rates, payable at least, as the State Fair Board determines and shall become due and payable not more than forty (40) years from the date of issuance. The payment of the bonds, together with the interest thereon, may be secured by a pledge and a first lien on all the receipts and revenue derived or to be derived, from any physical property under the control of the board. Neither the payment of any bond, nor the interest on the bond, issued under the authority of this section, shall constitute an indebtedness of the Commonwealth of Kentucky or of the State Fair Board, nor shall any bond or interest on the bond be payable out of any fund except any funds as may be derived from rentals or other revenues derived from the operation of the properties or from revenues as may have been, or may be, available for a purpose or purposes, by law.

All bonds which may be issued by the board under the provisions of this section shall be sold to the highest bidder after having been advertised by publication pursuant to KRS Chapter 424, and by other advertising as the board may prescribe if it finds additional advertising is necessary.

All competitive bids for the sale of the revenue bonds shall be opened and read publicly by the board or its representative at a designated place, day, and hour, all of which shall be announced in the advertising.

Except as otherwise specifically provided in this section, the board is vested with all of the rights, powers, and duties set forth and enumerated under KRS Chapter 58.

In the event the board issues and sells revenue bonds for a building project as authorized in KRS

247.140

and this section, it may carry insurance, including fire and windstorm, casualty, catastrophe, use and occupancy, and other insurance as the board may deem advisable in connection with the building project, and may obligate and bind itself in a trust indenture securing the payment of bonds. Any insurance shall be paid for out of the funds available for the project.

All money from the sale of revenue bonds shall be paid to the State Treasurer and shall be held by him as a special trust fund to be designated as directed by the board, and no part shall be withdrawn from the State Treasury except for the purposes authorized by this section, together with the cost incidental to the issuing and selling of the bonds and other directly related expenses. The board may likewise provide in any trust indenture securing revenue bonds for additional terms and conditions, or for other restrictions not in conflict with this section.

History.

4618j-1, 4618j-3: amend. Acts 1950, ch. 217, § 4; 1966, ch. 239, § 176; 1996, ch. 274, § 57, effective July 15, 1996.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Acquisition and development of public projects by governmental units and agencies, through revenue bonds, KRS ch. 58.

No property exempt from taxation except as provided in Constitution, Ky. Const., § 3.

Property exempt from taxation, Ky. Const., §§ 170, 171.

Kentucky Law Journal.

The Government Corporation in Kentucky, II. 20 Ky. L.J. 286 (1941).

247.190.
Revenues of State Fair Board, use and disposition of — Deposit of funds — Accounting and report — Board empowered to receive tax revenues from any governmental unit and financial contributions from others, as specified.

All revenues derived by the State Fair Board from the use of properties and facilities under its custody and control shall be used exclusively for the purpose of defraying the expenses of the board, the cost of the management and operation of such properties and facilities, the payment of interest and principal upon any indebtedness incurred by the board for such properties and facilities, the creation of adequate reserves for the repair and replacement thereof, and for the financing of further extensions, improvements, and additions thereto. Included in the cost of operation may be such promotional activities as the State Fair Board may determine upon as calculated to stimulate and increase the use and the revenues of such facilities, and to increase and stimulate the interest and usefulness of the State Fair. Any surplus revenues remaining after full provision for the above purposes shall be used to reduce the admission fees and charges to the public for attendance upon the State Fair and for public use by the citizens of the Commonwealth of the facilities of the State Fair Board, and shall on no account be appropriated to any other agency or function.

The State Fair Board shall generally cause its funds to be deposited in the State Treasurer’s office, to be withdrawn on appropriate vouchers approved by the board, but may create special accounts in other depositories for the purpose of securing the prompt payment of interest and principal on any of its bonded indebtedness if in the judgment of the board, or, if as determined by competitive bids, the creation of such special accounts and depositories is advantageous and economical to the board.

The State Fair Board may receive tax revenues from any governmental unit and financial contributions from local governments, private persons, or foundations.

An annual accounting of the funds of the state fair board shall be made by the Auditor of Public Accounts and reported to the Governor and the Legislative Research Commission for the benefit of Governor and the General Assembly.

History.

4618j-4: amend. Acts 1950, ch. 217, § 5; 2021 ch. 163, § 9, effective March 29, 2021.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Auditor of public accounts, KRS ch. 43.

247.200.
Free passes prohibited. [Repealed]

History.

4618i-7; repealed by 2016 ch. 142, § 9, effective April 27, 2016.

Compiler's Notes.

This section (Enact. 4618i-7, effective October 1, 1942) was repealed by Acts
2016, ch. 142, § 9, effective April 27, 2016.

247.210.
Fair board member or department official not to be exhibitor.

No member of the State Fair Board or any official of any department shall be an exhibitor in competition for premium or prize money at any State Fair held while he is a member of the State Fair Board or an official of any department.

History.

4618i-8.

247.220.
Grant of funds to local fairs for premiums and facilities — Fair Council — Meetings — Members.

The Commissioner of Agriculture shall make grants of state funds to qualified local agricultural fairs on a matching basis, to be used by them to pay premium awards for exhibits and displays of domestic livestock, poultry, harness horse racing, other horse events, and agricultural products. The premiums actually awarded shall conform to those appearing on the premium list issued by the fair.

The state may provide funds for use in the establishment of new facilities and improvement of existing facilities for use in conducting events at local agricultural fairs as provided by this section. No grant for buildings shall be made until the local fair board has complied with the local fair program and qualified for the state grant as provided in subsection (5) of this section. Grants for facilities shall be made under regulations promulgated by the Fair Council and the Commissioner of Agriculture. In no event shall the allocation for facilities result in a decrease in the number of approved agricultural classes or premiums.

There shall be a Fair Council in the Department of Agriculture. The council shall act in an advisory capacity to the Commissioner in all matters pertaining to the administration of the department’s fair program. It shall be called into session when there are matters for its consideration. It shall meet at least twice each calendar year at Frankfort or at any other place that may be determined.

The council shall be composed of:

The Commissioner, or the Commissioner’s designee, as chairman;

The Presidents or their designated representatives of the following state groups:

Kentucky Farm Bureau Federation;

Kentucky Association of Fairs and Horse Shows, Inc.;

Kentucky Horse Racing Commission;

American Saddlebred Horse Association; and

Kentucky Walking Horse Association;

The Agricultural Education Consultant of the Kentucky Department of Education;

The dean of the University of Kentucky College of Agriculture, Food and Environment, or the dean’s designee;

The co-chairs of the Interim Joint Committee on Agriculture; and

Two (2) representatives appointed by the Commissioner who are experienced in showing livestock or animal agriculture.

The Commissioner may, with the concurrence of a majority of the members of the council, appoint additional members to the council.

To qualify for a grant of state funds, a fair shall meet standards set by the Commissioner and his advisory council whose approval may be given only if the fair:

Provides in its bylaws for holding an annual fair running for at least three (3) days;

Presents, through the medium of youth organizations such as 4-H clubs, Future Farmers of America, and other similar organizations, an educational program concerning the production and marketing of the livestock, poultry, and horse industries;

Complies with all administrative regulations which the Department of Agriculture is hereby authorized to promulgate; and

Appoints one (1) or more members to its fair board from local livestock associations, horsemen’s associations, and county farm bureaus, and selects one (1) or more county extension agents and vocational agriculture teachers for counties served by the fair as members of the board. Wherever local livestock associations, horsemen’s associations, and farm bureaus are in existence, appointees are to be nominated to the fair board by these organizations. Where fairs serve an area, appointments may be made from all counties within the particular area. It shall be the responsibility of the appointees to aid in establishing premium lists and planning agricultural exhibits.

Any fair receiving a grant of state funds shall file with the director of the Shows and Fairs Division in the Department of Agriculture, by December 1 of the year in which the grant is received, satisfactory proof that all state premium awards have been paid and a certified notarized financial report submitted by the treasurer of the local fair association.

History.

39-1, 39-2: amend. Acts 1962, ch. 241; 1968, ch. 93, § 1; 1970, ch. 315, § 1; 1976, ch. 317, § 1; 2002, ch. 49, § 2, effective July 15, 2002; 2010, ch. 135, § 5, effective July 15, 2010; 2016 ch. 142, § 6, effective April 27, 2016; 2018 ch. 3, § 3, effective July 14, 2018; 2022 ch. 215, § 1, effective July 14, 2022.

247.226.
North American International Livestock Exposition Executive Committee.

There is created the North American International Livestock Exposition Executive Committee which shall be attached for administrative purposes to the North American International Livestock Exposition Branch within the Division of Expositions within the State Fair Board. The committee members shall receive no salary but shall be reimbursed for their expenses incurred in the performance of their duties in accordance with state regulations and such expenses shall be paid from agency receipts.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 61, § 1, effective July 15, 1986; 1990, ch. 485, § 3, effective July 13, 1990; 2009, ch. 14, § 2, effective June 25, 2009; 2016 ch. 142, § 7, effective April 27, 2016.